Mississippi, session 2026, SB2307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 75-57-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-57-5.  Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions which follow govern the construction and meanings of the terms used in this chapter: (a)  "Liquefied compressed gas" means both liquefied petroleum gas and anhydrous ammonia when the latter is used exclusively for commercial fertilizer.  For purposes of application to this chapter, the term "liquified compressed gas" shall also be construed to include natural gas and compressed natural gas with regard to application of the term to installers of systems and appliances for end-use residential and commercial customers. (b)  "Liquefied petroleum gas" means any material having a vapor pressure not exceeding that allowed for commercial propane, composed predominantly of the following hydrocarbons, either by themselves or as mixtures: propane, propylene, butane (normal butane or isobutane) and butylene (including isomers). (c)  "Natural gas and compressed natural gas" means any gaseous mixture containing primarily methane. (d)  "Anhydrous ammonia" means the compound formed by the combination of the two (2) gaseous elements, nitrogen and hydrogen, in the proportions of one (1) part of nitrogen to three (3) parts of hydrogen by volume. Anhydrous ammonia is ammonia gas in compressed and liquefied forms. It is not to be confused with aqueous ammonia, which is a solution of ammonia gas in water. Both liquefied petroleum gas and anhydrous ammonia are gaseous at normal atmospheric temperatures and pressures but are readily liquefiable by the application of moderate pressures. (e)  "Natural gas carburetion system" means any compressed natural gas carburetion system. (f)  "Natural gas fueling system" means an assembly consisting of compressors, containers, piping and other delivery devices for the purpose of compressing natural gas for use as a fuel in a motor vehicle and thereafter storing and/or dispensing the compressed natural gas for such use. (g)  "Installer" means any person who has satisfactorily passed an examination under the supervision of the Commissioner of Insurance testing his knowledge and ability to install or repair properly domestic systems, industrial systems, liquefied petroleum gas carburetion systems, natural gas carburetion systems, bulk plant systems, standby plant systems, anhydrous ammonia systems, or other similar systems and who holds an installer's certificate as provided in this chapter. (h)  "Container" means any vessel, including cylinders, tanks, portable tanks and cargo tanks, used for the transporting or storing of the liquefied compressed gases or compressed natural gas, except containers which are subject to inspection under federal laws or regulations. (i)  "Compressed gas" means any material or mixture having in the container an absolute pressure exceeding forty (40) pounds per square inch absolute at seventy (70) degrees Fahrenheit or, regardless of the pressure, at seventy (70) degrees Fahrenheit, having an absolute pressure exceeding one hundred four (104) pounds per square inch absolute at one hundred thirty (130) degrees Fahrenheit. (j)  "Flammable liquid" means any liquid having a closed cup flash point below one hundred four (104) degrees Fahrenheit and having a vapor pressure not exceeding forty (40) pounds per square inch absolute at one hundred (100) degrees Fahrenheit. (k)  "Gas appliance" means any device which utilizes gas to produce light, heat, power, refrigeration or air conditioning. (l)  "System" means an assembly consisting of one or more containers with a means for conveying liquefied compressed gas or compressed natural gas from the container or containers to dispensing or consuming devices (either continuously or intermittently) and which incorporates components intended to achieve control of quantity, flow, pressure or state (either liquid or vapor). Agricultural implements and commercial installations used in refrigeration plants are excluded where anhydrous ammonia is used. (m)  "Atmospheric pressure container" means any container for the refrigerated storage of liquefied anhydrous ammonia designed for a maximum working pressure of fifteen (15) pounds per square inch gauge or less and having a water capacity in excess of seven hundred thousand (700,000) gallons. (n)  "Distributor" means any person who is engaged in the distribution of liquefied compressed gases, either wholesale or retail. Also included under this definition are "commercial carriers," as identified by the Interstate Commerce Commission, who transport or haul liquefied compressed gases which are to be distributed or sold within this state. (o)  "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, corporation, estate, trust or any other group or combination acting as a unit, and includes the plural as well as the singular in number. "Person" shall include husband or wife or both where joint benefits are derived from the operation of a business or activity covered under this chapter. "Person" shall include any state, county, municipality or other agency engaged in a business or activity covered under this chapter. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.